California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Programs shall be initiated, promoted, and developed through all of the following:

(1) Volunteers and volunteer groups.

(2) Partnership with local governmental agencies.

(3) Coordinated efforts of state agencies.

(4) Coordination and cooperation with federal programs.

(5) Partnership with private health and social service agencies, community benefit organizations, and health plans.

(6) Participation by older adults in the planning and operation of all programs and services that may affect them.

(b) It shall be the policy of this state to give attention to the unique concerns of older adults with the greatest social and economic needs.

(c) In recognition of the many governmental programs serving older adults, and as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 9102, the California Department of Aging should coordinate, as existing resources permit, with other state departments in doing all of the following:

(1) Promote clear
 and simplified access to information assistance and services arrangements.

(2) Ensure that older adults retain the right of free choice in planning and managing their lives.

(3) Ensure that health and social services are available to do all of the following:

(A) Allow older adults to live independently at home or with others.

(B) Provide for advocacy for expansion of existing programs that prevent or minimize illness or social isolation, and allow individuals to maximize their dignity and choice of living.

(C) Provide for protection of older adults from physical and mental abuse, neglect, and fraudulent practices.

(4) Foster
 both preventive and primary health care, including mental and physical health care, to keep older adults active and contributing members of society.

(5) Encourage public and private development of suitable housing.

(6) Develop and seek support for plans to ensure access to information, counseling, and screening.

(7) Encourage public and private development of suitable housing and recreational opportunities to meet the needs of older adults.

(8) Encourage development of efficient community services including access to low-cost transportation services, that provide a choice in supported living arrangements and social assistance in a coordinated manner and that are readily available when needed.

(9) Encourage and develop meaningful employment opportunities for older adults.

(10) Encourage the development of barrier-free construction and the removal of architectural barriers, so that more facilities are accessible to older adults.

(11) Promote development of programs to educate persons who work with older adults.

(12) Encourage and support intergenerational programming and participation by community organizations and institutions to promote better understanding among the generations.

(d) The California Department of Aging shall ensure that, to the extent possible, the services provided for in accordance with this division shall be coordinated and integrated with services provided to older adults by other entities of the state. That
 integration may include, but not be limited to, the reconfiguration of state departments into a coordinated unit that can provide for multiple services to the same consumers. Services provided under this division shall be managed, directly or through contract, by local area agencies on aging or other local systems.

(e) On or before September 30, 2027, and in consultation with area agencies on aging and stakeholders, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify the core programs and services to be provided to older adults and family caregivers, as directed by the Older Americans Act by all area agencies on aging or their contracted service providers.

(2) Submit to the Legislature and the federal Administration for Community Living an update to the intrastate funding formula, based on any revised area agency on aging designations and any modifications to planning service area map boundaries, and other factors and weights that may be adopted or required under state and federal statute and regulations.

(3) Develop objectives, key results, and a performance measurement methodology for core programs and services identified in paragraph (1) for adoption by the area agencies on aging.

(4) Develop a statewide consumer engagement plan. The statewide consumer engagement plan shall seek to raise public awareness of older adult and family caregiver programs and services, identify access points for information and assistance, provide consistent messaging to all audiences, and improve outreach to underrepresented communities and underserved populations, including rural Californians, Asian-Pacific Islander, Black, Latino, Native American and LGBTQ+ older adults, people with disabilities, and family caregivers.

(f) (1) In consultation with area agencies on aging and stakeholders, the department shall develop and
 submit regulations to the Office of Administrative Law that address, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) The application process to determine an area agency on aging designation.

(B) The criteria used for an area agency on aging designation.

(C) The criteria used to remove an area agency on aging designation.

(D) Substantive updates to the intrastate funding formula.

(2) At the conclusion of the rulemaking process identified in paragraph (1), the department may consider letters of intent from counties interested in being considered for designation as the area agency on aging that serves its local jurisdiction.

(3) The
 department shall submit a plan including the updated area agency on aging designations and any corresponding changes to the statewide planning and service area map to the Legislature at least 90 days before final adoption.

(g) (1) A change made pursuant to this section shall be made in accordance with applicable federal statutes and regulations.

(2) The department shall take reasonable steps to ensure minimal disruption in the provision of older adult and family caregiver services in affected counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 14.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.5.

The deliverables identified in Section 9002 shall be informed by data from validated sources, which may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(a) The United States Census.

(b) The Department of Finance.

(c) The Master Plan for Aging Data Dashboard.

(d) The Elder Index.

(e) The Healthy Places Index.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 4.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

(a) If any section of this code relating to aging cannot be given effect without causing this state’s plan to be out of conformity with federal requirements, the section shall become inoperative to the extent that it is not in conformity with federal requirements.

(b) The planning, development, and implementation of changes in this division shall encourage and allow concurrent implementation and operation of a long-term care integration pilot project consistent with the intent of Article 4.05 (commencing with Section 14139.05) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9. In implementing changes to this division, the department shall work with the State Department of Health Services to ensure local determination and local designation of the most appropriate long-term care services agency for each Long-Term Care Integration Pilot Project site.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9004.

Unless the context otherwise indicates, the definitions of the terms set forth in this chapter apply for purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9004.5.

“Adult day health care” means an organized day program of therapeutic, social, and health activities and services provided pursuant to this division to elderly persons with functional impairments, either physical or mental, for the purpose of restoring or maintaining optimum capacity for self-care. When provided on a short-term basis, adult day health care serves as a transition from a health facility or home health program to personal independence. When provided on a long-term basis, adult day health care services as an option to institutionalization in long-term care facilities, when 24-hour skilled nursing care is not medically necessary or viewed as desirable by the recipient or his or her family.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9005.

“Advisory council” means a specific representative body of laypersons and service providers that represent the interests of older individuals within the boundaries of a planning and service area and that is officially recognized by the area agency on aging, the commission, and the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9006.

“Area agency on aging” means a private nonprofit or public agency designated by the department that works for the interests of older Californians within a planning and service area, and engages in community planning, coordination, and program development and, through contractual arrangements, provides a broad array of social and nutritional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9007.

“Care or case management services” means:

(a) Client assessment, in conjunction with the development of a service plan with the participant and appropriate others, to provide for needs identified by the assessment.

(b) Authorization and arrangement for the purchase of services, or referral, with follow-up, to volunteer, informal, or third-party payer services.

(c) Service and participant monitoring to determine that services obtained were appropriate to need, adequate to meet the need, of acceptable quality, and provided in a timely manner.

(d) Followup with clients, including periodic contact and initiation of an interim assessment, if deemed necessary prior to scheduled reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9008.

“Commission” means the California Commission on Aging.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9009.

(a) “Elder Economic Security Standard Index” means an index, available on the Internet, that quantifies the costs in the private market for meeting the basic needs of elders, including, but not limited to, the costs of essential household items, food, health care, shelter, transportation, and utilities.

(b) The Elder Economic Security Standard Index is updated biennially by the University of California, Los Angeles Center for Health Policy Research, using publicly available data sources on the costs to live in each county of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   (AB 138)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9010.

“Comprehensive and coordinated system” means a program of interrelated social and nutrition services designed to meet the needs of older individuals in a planning and service area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9011.

“Department” means the California Department of Aging.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9012.

“Director” means the Director of the California Department of Aging.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9013.

“Frail elderly” means a person having those chronic physical or mental limitations that restrict individual ability to carry out normal activities of daily living and that threaten an individual’s capacity to live an independent life.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9014.

“Greatest economic need” means the need resulting from an income level at or below the poverty threshold established by the Bureau of the Census.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9015.

“Greatest social need” means the need caused by noneconomic factors that restrict an individual’s ability to perform normal daily tasks or that threaten an individual’s capacity to live independently. These factors include physical or mental disability, language barriers, and cultural or social isolation caused by, among other things, racial and ethnic status, sexual orientation, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) status, gender identity, or gender expression.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 258)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9016.

“Long-term care” means a coordinated continuum of preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, supportive, and maintenance services that address the health, social, and personal needs of individuals who have restricted self-care capabilities. Services shall be designed to recognize the positive capabilities of the individual and maximize the potential for the optimum level of physical, social, and mental well-being in the least restrictive environment. Emphasis shall be placed on seeking services alternatives to institutionalization. Services may be provided by formal or informal support systems, and may be continuous or intermittent. “Long-term care” may include licensed nursing facility, adult residential care, residential facility for the elderly, private duty nursing, or home- and community-based services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 242, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9017.

“Older Americans Act” means Chapter 35 (commencing with Section 3001) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9018.

“Older individual” or “elderly” means a person 60 years of age or older, except where this provision is inconsistent with federal requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9019.

“Personal and community support networks” means families, friends, neighbors, church groups and community organizations to which the elderly turn naturally to for assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9020.

“Planning and service area” means an area specified by the department as directed by the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9021.

“Preventive services” means services that avoid dependency and assist older persons in maintaining their good health, well-being, and growth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9022.

“Supportive services” means services that maintain individuals in home environments and avoid institutional care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9023.

“Systems of home and community based services” means an integrated continuum of service options available locally to older individuals and functionally impaired adults, through programs administered by the department who seek to maximize self-care and independent living in the home or homelike environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. California Department of Aging [9100. - 9175.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [9100. - 9114.]

9100.

(a) There is in the California Health and Human Services Agency, the California Department of Aging.

(b) The department’s mission is to provide leadership to the area agencies on aging in developing systems of home- and community-based services that maintain individuals in their own homes or least restrictive homelike environments.

(c) (1) In fulfilling its mission, the department shall develop minimum standards for service delivery to ensure that its programs meet consumer needs, operate in a cost-effective manner, and preserve the independence and dignity of aging Californians. In accomplishing its mission, the department shall consider available data and population trends in
 developing programs and policies, collaborate with area agencies on aging, the commission, and other state and local agencies, and consider the views of advocates, consumers and their families, and service providers.

(2) The department shall report the California Elder Economic Security Standard Index data for each service area in its state plan and use it as a reference when making decisions about allocating its existing resources, but only if the California Elder Economic Security Standard Index is updated and made available to the department, and if the available public data used to calculate each California Elder Economic Security Standard Index data element is calculated and updated for each California county and made available to the department in a format that displays each county’s specific data.

(d) The minimum standards for the department programs shall ensure that the
 system meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Have the flexibility to respond to the needs of individuals and their families and caregivers.

(2) Provide for consumer choice and self-determination.

(3) Enable consumers to be involved in designing and monitoring the system.

(4) Be equally accessible to diverse populations regardless of income, consistent with state and federal law.

(5) Have consistent statewide policy, with local choice, control, and implementation.

(6) Include preventive services and home- and community-based support.

(7) Have cost
 containment and fiscal incentives consistent with the delivery of appropriate services at the appropriate level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 5.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9101.

(a) The department shall consist of a director, and any staff as may be necessary for proper administration.

(b) The department shall maintain its main office in Sacramento.

(c) The Governor, with the consent of the Senate, shall appoint the director. The Governor shall consider, but not be limited to, recommendations from the commission.

(d) The director shall have the powers of a head of a department pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall receive the salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code.

(e) The director shall do all of the following:

(1) Be responsible for the management of the department and achievement of its statewide goals.

(2) Assist the commission in carrying out its mandated duties and responsibilities in accordance with Section 9202.

(3) Coordinate with other state agencies that provide services to older adults, people with disabilities, and caregivers, including, but not limited to, the entities listed in subdivision (f).

(f) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall ensure effective coordination among departments of the agency in carrying out the mandates of this division. For this purpose, the secretary shall regularly convene
 meetings concerning services to older adults that shall include, but not be limited to, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Public Health, and the department.

(g) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall also encourage other state entities that have other programs for older adults to actively participate in periodic joint meetings for the joint purpose of coordinating service activities. These entities shall include, but not be limited to, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Department of Parks and Recreation in the Natural Resources Agency, the Transportation Agency, the California Arts Council, and the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 6.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9101.1.

In developing the Master Plan for Aging pursuant to Executive Order N-14-19, the Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall consider applying, on behalf of the State of California, to join the AARP Network of Age-Friendly States and Communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 820, Sec. 3.   (AB 1118)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.

The duties and powers of the department shall be as follows:

(a) To administer all programs under the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, and this division, including providing leadership and technical assistance to the local area agencies on aging, including ongoing oversight, monitoring, and service quality evaluation of those agencies to ensure that service providers are meeting standards of service performance established by the department. This shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Setting program standards and providing standard materials for training.

(2) Providing technical assistance to area agencies on aging, program
 managers, staff, and volunteers providing services.

(3) Development of the state plan on aging according to federal law.

(4) Maintain a clearinghouse of information related to the interests and needs of older individuals and provide referral services, if appropriate.

(5) Maintain a management information and reporting system; including a database on service utilization patterns and demographic characteristics of the older population to be cross-classified by age, sex, race, and other information required for the planning process, and eliminate redundant and unnecessary reporting requirements.

(6) Encourage and support the involvement of volunteers in services to older individuals.

(7) Seek
 ways to utilize the private sector to assume greater responsibility in meeting the needs of older individuals.

(8) Encourage internships to be coordinated with schools of gerontology or related disciplines, including internships for older individuals.

(b) The department shall have primary responsibility for dispersing information and providing technical assistance to the area agencies on aging.

(c) The department shall be responsible for activities that promote the development, coordination, and utilization of resources to meet the long-term services and supports needs of older adults and persons with disabilities, consistent with its mission. The responsibilities shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Conduct research in the
 areas of alternative social and health care systems for older individuals.

(2) As specified in Section 9002, coordinate with agencies and departments that administer health, social, and related services to older adults and people with disabilities for the purposes of policy development, development of care standards, consistency in application of policy, and evaluation of alternative uses of available resources toward greater effectiveness in service delivery, including seeking additional federal and private dollars to support achievement of program system goals in developing integrated, coordinated systems of care.

(3) Monitor and evaluate programs and services administered by the department, utilizing standardized methodology.

(4) Develop and implement training and technical assistance programs designed to achieve
 program goals.

(5) Establish criteria for the designation, sanctioning, and defunding of area agencies on aging.

(d) In conjunction with the management information and reporting system required under paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), beginning in the 2006 calendar year, the department shall annually submit by January 10 of each year, to the budget, fiscal, and policy committees of the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst, all of the following information:

(1) The number of persons served statewide in each of the prior and current fiscal years for each state or federally funded program or service administered by the department. This information shall also be provided for each Area Agency on Aging service area.

(2) To the extent feasible, the number
 of unduplicated persons served statewide in the prior and current fiscal years for all state or federally funded programs and services administered by the department. To the extent feasible, this information shall also be provided for each Area Agency on Aging service area.

(3) Total estimated statewide expenditures in the prior, current, and budget fiscal years for each state or federally funded program or service administered by the department. This information shall also be provided for each Area Agency on Aging service area.

(e) The report required by subdivision (d) shall be suspended until the 2010–11 fiscal year. In lieu of that information, the department shall submit to the budget, fiscal, and policy committees of the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst, by March 1 of each year, copies of the program factsheets for each state and federal program administered by the
 department. The department shall update the information included in the program factsheets annually, before submitting them as required by this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 8.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Recent studies have shown that lifelong experiences of marginalization place lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender (LGBT) older adults at high risk for isolation, poverty, homelessness, and premature institutionalization. Moreover, many LGBT older adults are members of multiple underrepresented groups, and, as a result, are doubly marginalized. Due to these factors, many LGBT older adults avoid accessing elder programs and services, even when their health, safety, and security depend on it.

(b) LGBT older adults often lack social and family support networks available to non-LGBT older adults. They may face particular health risks, as disease prevention strategies
 often ignore LGBT older adults, and HIV and AIDS drug trials generally do not include older participants.

(c) LGBT older adults are denied many vital financial benefits provided to heterosexual married couples. For example, surviving same-sex partners are denied the social security benefits that married couples are provided, and may face heavy taxes on the transfer of assets upon the death of a partner. Moreover, even under California law, LGBT older adults are denied equal long-term care insurance protections. This costs LGBT older adults hundreds of millions of dollars each year in lost benefits.

(d) The number of people 65 years of age and older in California is estimated to double to 6.5 million by the year 2020, thereby increasing the number of LGBT older adults who are receiving inadequate services.

(e) Ensuring that the needs of LGBT older adults as well as other underrepresented groups are adequately assessed during the planning and development of programs and services will increase access to the programs administered by the California Department of Aging and the area agencies on aging.

(f) California leads the nation in the protections it affords to LGBT persons. As the failure to meet the needs of LGBT older adults is a problem of national scope, including LGBT older adults and other underrepresented groups in need of assessment and area plan process will help the state to be a model for change in other states and at the federal level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 9.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.1.

(a) The department shall ensure all older adults have equal access to programs and services provided through the Older Americans Act and under this division in each planning and services area, regardless of physical or mental disabilities, language barriers, cultural or social isolation, including that caused by actual or perceived racial and ethnic status, including, but not limited to, African-American, Hispanic, American Indian, and Asian American, ancestry, national origin, religion, sex, gender identity, marital status, familial status, sexual orientation, or any other basis set forth in Section 12921 of the Government Code, or by association with a person or persons with one or more of these actual or perceived characteristics, that restrict an individual’s ability to perform normal daily tasks or that threaten his or her capacity to live independently.

(b) This section is not intended to increase General Fund obligations for programs administered by area agencies on aging.

(c) The department shall require that each area agency on aging include the needs of lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender seniors in their needs assessment and area plans.

(d) The department shall provide technical assistance to the area agencies on aging regarding the unique needs of the lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender seniors.

(e) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section. If the department determines that adopting regulations is necessary, it shall do so only after consultation with the area agencies on aging and the California Association of Area Agencies on Aging.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.

(a) Subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the California Department of Aging shall administer the Access to Technology Program for older adults and adults with disabilities, a pilot program to connect older adults and adults with disabilities to technology to help reduce isolation, increase connections, and enhance self-confidence.

(1) Funds appropriated for this program shall be provided to county human services departments that opt to participate in the pilot program.

(2) Grant amounts to counties shall be provided based on county size and whether the county is rural, urban, or suburban. The grant amounts for each county size and type
 shall be developed by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association.

(b) Allowable uses of the funds provided to counties that receive grant funding through the program include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Providing technology, which may include, but is not limited to, laptops, tablets, and smartphones, to older adults and adults with disabilities.

(2) Arranging for reliable internet access to older adults and adults with disabilities.

(3) Developing or arranging for education and training for older adults and adults with disabilities on the use of technology.

(4) Conducting outreach about the program.

(5) Administration of the program, including data collection and reporting.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that counties that opt into the pilot program describe how they intend to leverage existing programs, if applicable, that provide one or more of the services listed in subdivision (b) in order to provide maximum benefit to the greatest number of residents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 19.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.

The department may adopt and promulgate regulations for the purpose of carrying out this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.1.

The department, in partnership with the area agencies on aging, the Department of Rehabilitation, any independent living centers, any contractor selected to implement the federal Assistive Technology Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-394), and any organization that serves older adults and people with disabilities, may develop and provide consumer advice regarding home modification for older adults and people with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 10.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9106.

(a) The department shall administer the administrative cost limitation, as defined in applicable federal law or regulation on a statewide basis. This allocation shall be based on notices of grant award. The formula to be used for the allocation of those funds shall be as follows:

(1) Each planning and service area shall receive a base allocation of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) The remainder of the funds available up to the statewide limitation shall be distributed to area agencies on aging on the basis of the number of persons over the age of 60 years per planning and service area.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that in the event that an area agency on aging chooses to use other sources of funds for the administration of its area plan, the federal money made available to that area agency on aging for administration shall be used for the provision of direct services within its planning and service area.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.

The department may accept gifts and grants from any source, public or private, to assist it in the performance of its functions, and these gifts and grants shall operate to augment any appropriation made for the support of the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9108.

In addition to any nutrition programs conducted under the McCarthy-Kennick Nutrition Program for the Elderly Act of 1972 (Chapter 5.7 (commencing with Section 18325) of Part 6 of Division 9), the department, with the approval of the Department of Finance, may make funds available from Section 17 of Chapter 157 of the Statutes of 1976 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9200) to other nutrition projects serving the needs of individuals aged 60 or over and their spouses provided by public or private nonprofit persons or agencies upon such terms and conditions as the department specifies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9109.

The department shall, in consultation with nutrition site directors and area agencies on aging, develop policies and guidelines for senior nutrition sites that ensure food safety and that maximize the use of leftover meals and food products. The guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, senior education programs on good nutrition and handling, storage of leftover foods, and reviewing current nutrition site reservation procedures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9110.

(a) The department may make available state funds to fund senior nutrition programs that complement programs implemented pursuant to Title III of the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3021).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9111.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a great disparity in the method by which the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001, et seq.) and General Fund moneys are distributed to the 33 area agencies on aging in this state.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to correct these inequities in funding for nutrition and social service programs. It is further the intent of the Legislature that correction of these inequities be accomplished with minimal disruption to existing program services.

(c) The department, in consultation with the commission, the Area Agency on Aging Advisory Council of California, the California Association of Area Agencies on Aging, and representatives of provider groups, shall review the existing intrastate funding formula, established pursuant to Section 9112, for the allocation of state and federal funds provided for programs under Title III of the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3021 et seq.). The department shall update the formula in accordance with federal regulations and shall submit a report thereon to the chairperson of the fiscal committee of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, no later than December 1, 1986. Changes to the intrastate funding formula may only be made by the Legislature.

(d) The department and commission shall hold hearings and present alternative criteria for public input relative to the funding formula provided for under subdivision (a).

(e) The department, based upon analysis and testimony provided for pursuant to subdivision (d), and information provided by the public, shall develop an implementation plan with cost factors to achieve parity amongst the area agencies on aging in California.

(f) The department shall ensure that priority consideration shall be given to criteria that reflect the state’s intent to target services to those in greatest economic or social need, including, but not limited to, the low-income, non-English speaking, minority, and frail elderly.

(g) The department shall report to the Legislature on the activities provided for in this section no later than December 1, 1986.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9112.

(a) The department shall implement an intrastate funding formula in accordance with all federal regulations. This formula shall apply to all federal and state funds allocated for programs provided for under Title III of the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3021, et seq.).

(b) The intrastate funding formula shall include all of the following:

(1) Assurances that all area agencies on aging shall have a fifty thousand dollar ($50,000) administrative base with the remainder of the allowable administrative dollars allocated to planning and service areas on the basis of number of persons over the age of 60 years.

(2) (A) When data is available, an annual update by the department for changes in population characteristics to include the number of persons per planning and service area over the age of 60 years and persons in greatest economic or social need as measured by all of the following variables which shall also be annually updated by the department:
